Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB740.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 27A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish and maintain a crime
victim notification system.
(2) The system shall:
(a) Interface with any case management system operated by a county or
Commonwealth's attorney and the Department of Corrections to ensure the
prompt reporting and receiving of case information;
(b) Establish technical and operational protocols for system interoperability;
(c) Allow a victim, as defined in KRS 421.500, to register to receive
notifications regarding court proceedings, case dispositions, offender
custody status, and parole hearings and decisions related to the case for
which the victim has registered by providing requisite information
determined by the Administrative Office of the Courts;
(d) Allow a victim who elects to register for notifications to select multiple
methods of notification, including by telephone, email, and mobile
applications;
(e) Ensure confidentiality and secure handling of victim information in
compliance with applicable state and federal privacy requirements;
(f) Be available in multiple languages; and
(g) Permit a victim to opt out at any time and to have his or her personal
information deleted from the system.
(3) Nothing in this section shall limit the duties of public officers and agencies
required under KRS 421.500 to 421.575.
(4) If the crime victim notification system cannot be developed internally, the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1890
Administrative Office of the Courts may enter into a contract with a third-party
vendor to comply with the requirements of this section through the established
competitive bid and procurement process of the Administrative Office of the
Courts.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$800,000 in fiscal year 2024-2025 to the Court Operations and Administration budget
unit under the Judicial Branch from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established
by KRS 48.705 for the purpose of implementation of the provisions of Section 1 of this
Act. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed